Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
Number of Reviews
30

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     Michael Crichton has had a long career of writing novels, many of
which are science fiction.  The most profitable film adaptation of any
novel was an adaptation of a Michael Crichton science fiction novel.
So in the logic of the film industry a good way to make a profitable
film would be to make a big-budget adaptation of another Crichton
science fiction novel.  CONGO failed, and I am afraid that SPHERE is
probably not going to fare a whole lot better.  It a little better than
just okay novel and it makes a film that is not even that good.  The
film is expensive, over one hundred million dollars; is long, 133
minutes; has a terrific cast, including Dustin Hoffman, Samuel L.
Jackson, and Sharon Stone; but has little that is really original and
less that is exciting.
     Several years ago Dr. Norman Goodman (played by Dustin Hoffman)
was asked to write up a set of procedures for the government to
follow if an alien entity was actually encountered.  The plan he
wrote was only semi-serious, but did explicitly define a team of
experts who should investigate the alien.  Now that team has been
assembled by a mysterious team leader named Barnes (Peter Coyote) to
study a spacecraft almost a half mile in length that apparently
dropped into the Pacific Ocean in the early 1700s.  Suddenly Norman's
less than serious procedure has become an action plan for dealing
with a real alien spacecraft.  Included in the team to investigate
are mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), biologist Beth
Halperin (Sharon Stone), and astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev
Schreiber).  Together they travel to the deep Pacific spaceship to
understand its secrets.  One major secret is the meaning of the huge
sphere of gold-toned liquid metal at the heart of this spaceship.
     What is disappointing about this film is that it does not have
really effective performances.  Director Barry Levinson is at his best
with good actors rather than good special effects.  The problem here is
he is making a big-budget science fiction film.  It has some effects,
but the most intriguing effect he shows only as an outline on a radar
screen.  The technique is to suggest rather than to show and let the
actors and the viewer's imagination carry the film as Robert Wise did
with THE HAUNTING.  That could be a reasonable approach in a low-budget
film.  But that requires creating much more atmosphere than Levinson
can manage to muster.  It requires the actors to give really compelling
performances and simply put, they don't.  Hoffman's acting seems muted.
Jackson seems to laid back.  We do not feel for these characters and
do not get inside their heads.  Levinson paid big bucks for his actors
and does not really get price performance.  And why we have Queen
Latifah as a minor functionary on the expedition is anybody's guess.A
cast of unknowns could have delivered as much emotional impact at a
fraction of the price.  Look how much more powerful a film like ALIEN
was with only moderate actors.
     Most science fiction spectaculars these days have second-tier
actors and first-tier special effects.  Levinson tries second-tier
effects, and first-tier actors, but never makes that exchange pay off
for the viewer.  Perhaps sci-fi spectaculars are just not an actor's
medium.  The result gets a 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Warner Bros./Baltimore Pictures
 Director:  Barry Levinson
 Writer:  Stephen Hauser, Paul Attanasio, novel by Michael
Crichton, Kurt Wimmer's adaptation
 Cast: Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson,
Peter Coyote, Liev Schreiber
  If you could have whatever you wanted just by imagining or
dreaming, would you accept the offer?  Just think: if you like a
book, say, "20,000 Leagues Under the Sea," you could not
only conjure it up, but you could make it a best-seller in 1998
simply by placing a mental order for 100,000 copies!  You
could wish Saddam Hussein a nice life in exile in Tierra del
Fuego, or hope for a puppy for Christmas to your exact
specifications.  The folks who populate Barry Levinson's new
film, which could best be described, genre-wise, as
psychological sci-fi, did indeed possess this awesome potency
and yet realized, as the wise men in those interminable
monster movies of the 1950s that "perhaps we were not
meant to interfere with Mother Nature."
   Featuring an all-star cast of Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone,
Samuel L. Jackson and Peter Coyote and including also Liev
Schreiber (a favorite of the 20-somethings) and Queen Latifah
(in a laughably insignificant guise), "Sphere" is a
conglomeration of science fiction ideas that seems to
introduce every concept of the genre from the 1950s onward. 
It contains a few monsters (snakes, killer jellyfish); a team of
luminous scientists (two of whom received their first Ph.D's
before they were 19); a UFO; time travel; a black hole;
explosives which have convenient digital readouts so that the
movie audience can watch the proverbial race against time; a
few dazzling special effects; a romance and a few twists and
some witty dialogue.  Making yet again the mistake that more
is more, director Barry Levinson piles on the concepts with
such increasing rapidity that clarity takes a back seat to
spectacle, and believability is stretched to the breaking point.
   Levinson does have a way with timing, at least at first, as
the narrative opens slowly, its cleverest dialogue bunched up
against a background of relative calmness.  "Sphere" gathers
momentum compellingly but ideas are bounced off hither and
thither before the audience can catch its collective breath to
sort out the import.  
   When the appropriate U.S. governmental authority is led to
believe that a sunken craft lies 1000 beet beneath the sea, a
team of professionals is sent to the scene to explore the
object, the group including a marine biologist, a
mathematician, an astrophysicist and a psychologist. 
Submerging themselves, the explorers discover what looks
like a spacecraft that landed in the ocean in 1706, but are
startled by an array of surprises that cause them to be
alternately ecstatic and despondent.  Early on they are
stunned to discover a severely deteriorated corpse of an
American holding a bag of snack food, apparently
done in by a blunt blow to his skull by an enraged
assassin.  Little did these voyagers realize that history would
repeat itself: that the current company of men and women
were themselves in danger of turning against one another
with murderous rage.  Like the rest of us, each person in this
super-bright group of pilgrims has a dark side and, if given
the power to carry out their negative feelings, they could turn
their expedition into bedlam.  What furnishes them with this
very might is the eponymous sphere, a perfect circle which
appears to be a living being trapped under water for almost
three centuries and desperately lonely.
   To Barry Levinson's credit the director does not at any point
turn his movie into juvenile mayhem, the error made by Paul
Anderson in last year's poorly received "Event Horizon." 
Crew members do not become squashed against walls or
drowned in an ocean of blood, nor does this supernatural
sphere throw off little green monsters or vampire-like
essences.  Keeping the film more within the controlled
boundaries of Robert Zemeckis's cerebral "Contact," Levinson
does allow a few of the characters to become victimized by
lethal undersea creatures but in each case averts his camera
after summoning just a glimpse of the bloodshed to convince
us that the crew are in mortal danger.  
   While Norman Johnson (Dustin Hoffman) and Beth Halpern
(Sharon Stone) provide the obligatory romance (at one time
they had an affair but Norman never told Beth that he was
married), the chemistry between these two superstars is close
to zero.  But while Hoffman in no way enjoys the role he
captured so cleverly in "Wag the Dog," he still provides the
lion's share of the movie's wit while Sharon Stone lends the
picture some brief periods of psychotic breaks.  Samuel L.
Jackson contributes some knowing, low-key humor to the
piece and Peter Coyote, as the ship's leader, Harold Barnes,
does well as the authoritarian straight man.
   From time to time we are treated to some National
Geographic-type shots of the creatures of the deep, some of
which do not provide the relaxation they are known to
dispense when swimming about the constricted space of a
home aquarium.  At other times we are furnished the more
typical suspense of characters trying to outrun a menacing
time bomb.  We human beings are our own Frankenstein
monsters, as scripters Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio
strongly imply, but this notion--that we have the power to
destroy but do not possess the power to stop our destructive
tendencies--is submerged beneath a film that throws enough
perceptions for three movies.

Author
Brian Takeshita
Barry Levinson's SPHERE is the latest in a long line of films based on
a novel by Michael Crichton.  In this one, Dustin Hoffman plays Norman
Goodman, a psychologist who deals with survivors of airplane crashes,
and that's what he thinks he's supposed to be doing when he is taken
via helicopter to a small fleet of research vessels off the coast of
Guam.  Upon arrival on one of the ships, however, he learns that
several of his professional acquaintances are also present, and that
their mission is not to deal with a plane crash, but rather with an
alien spacecraft resting on the bottom of the ocean.
During the Bush administration, Goodman wrote a standard operating
procedure for alien contact, specifying the small team of experts who
should be present.  They include a scientist named Beth Halperin
(Sharon Stone), an astrophysicist named Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber),
and a mathematician named Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), who come
under the supervision of Harold Barnes (Peter Coyote), who works for
an ultra-secret government agency.  The team descends a thousand feet
to the ocean floor, where they are housed in an underwater habitat
built by the Navy, located close to the spacecraft.  Upon entering the
spacecraft, they find a liquid-lustrous golden sphere which reflects
everything in the room except them, indicating that the curious object
possibly chooses what it reflects.  Is the sphere sentient?  Their
question is answered when it makes contact with them through the
computer terminals of their underwater habitat.  Soon, however,
disasters involving attacking jellyfish, flooding, fire, and a giant
squid seem to appear at the whimsy of the strange alien entity.
SPHERE starts out quite promising as it wraps the audience in the
intrigue of trying to find out where the spacecraft came from and what
the mysterious orb is supposed to be.  However, when the
action/thriller elements begin about halfway through the film, the
extension of this mystery only serves to confuse the viewer.  We are
given several twists of plot, keeping us guessing as to the origin of
the violence being wrought upon the investigating team.  Under other
circumstances, this might help to further the tension, but in this
film, it just doesn't work.  The result is a confusing mess that makes
you jump every once in a while.
One of the reasons we don't go along with the plot twists is because
we don't really care too much about the characters.  Goodman is
indecisive, Halperin is paranoid and suicidal, Fielding is insecure,
and Adams just plain weirds out soon after the film starts.  A scene
where Fielding and Adams compare the ages at which they earned their
first doctorates does very little to lend sympathy to the characters,
as does another scene where Goodman confesses he defrauded the
government for some quick cash.  It would seem that the character we
care the most about is Barnes, who is outside the neurotic realm of
the super-educated.  Barnes is a smart fellow, but he's also more
dedicated to the job at hand than any of the others, and we just hope
that their foibles don't prevent him from getting out of the whole
thing alive.
Peter Coyote also provides the most convincing performance in spite of
the big-name cast.  Coyote delivers his lines well enough to make us
believe he must at the same time complete his mission and juggle the
egos and vagaries of civilians.  No big flourishes for him, just good
solid acting of a character with whom we can sympathize.  Stone, on
the other hand, flourishes a few times too often as her character goes
down the emotionally unstable path.  It's just too bad those
flourishes aren't at least convincing.  Diametrically opposed is
Hoffman, who is too understated in his performance to be a leading man
here.  His role requires a strong performance; a real stand-out, and
we just don't get that.  Jackson's performance is good as usual, but
his talents are contorted in this film due to the strange avenues the
screenplay and direction take us.  A disjointed storyline makes him
near-psychotic one moment, then friendly the next.
In terms of visual effects, SPHERE suffers from the underwater
syndrome.  We all know that it is dark and gloomy a thousand feet
below the ocean's surface, but it doesn't help us out much to give us
a movie that tries to approximate this.  There's one scene where the
team is descending in a submarine to visit the spacecraft for the
first time.  Fielding looks out a viewport and says, "Look at the size
of that thing."  Cut to a view of the craft punctuated by a fanfare of
music.  Too bad we couldn't see much, or it might have actually been
impressive.
This film tries so hard to be a thinking thriller that it makes
efforts which only go through the motions and fail to captivate.  One
part of this involves time travel, and there is the revelation that if
the future has no record of the team finding the sphere, that must
mean they don't get out alive.  To tell you why this is in violation
of most time travel theory would be to give away much of the plot, so
suffice to say that much of the convolution seems only to dazzle the
audience with self-congratulatory cleverness that is not technically
or intelligently proficient.
As I stated previously, SPHERE is only the latest in a long line of
Crichton-based movies.  A question occurred to me while viewing this
film:  Why doesn't Michael Crichton just become a screenwriter?  After
all, every time he writes a novel, he must know it is destined to be
made into a movie.  Why not just write the screenplay and cut out all
that preliminary stuff?  The answer I came up with is that he can make
a whole lot of money off the novels first, and then make even more
money off the movie option.  People by the millions purchase his
books, and you know what?  It's because he's Michael Crichton, the guy
whose books get made into movies.  "He must be good," these people say
in the aisles of Barnes and Noble, "or else they wouldn't keep making
movies out of his novels."  Well, I've got an inside scoop for you,
folks.  He's begun to write with the mentality that each story will,
in fact, be filmed.  He's become lazy and ineffectual as a novelist.
You see, writing for a reader is very different from writing for a
moviegoer.  In a novel, you must be descriptive in an artful way so
that the reader is almost unaware how he or she knows what a character
is like.  To simply read off a list of traits, background, and
emotions is boring and insulting.  "Show, don't tell" is one of the
most elementary tenets of writing fiction.  When you write a
screenplay, however, you list as much as possible, so the producer,
director, cinematographer, casting agent and actors know what the film
will look like and what is expected of each character.  In his novels,
Crichton has begun to list.  Big time.  At the behest of a friend, I
began to read his latest literary offering, but I couldn't get past
the first fourth of the book because of the number of times the author
insulted my intelligence by listing traits about the characters and
telling me everything about them the moment they appeared in the
story.  Sad, really, to find that this has happened to the same man
who once wrote novels like "Coma" and "The Great Train Robbery."  The
only good thing I can say about Crichton today is that he has at least
continued to write from a wellspring of varied and interesting
subjects, unlike someone like John Grisham, who only changes WHERE the
lawyers work.  But that's another story....

Author
Bob Bloom

 Sphere (1998) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone,
Samuel L. Jackson and Liev Schreiber. Directed by Barry Levinson
 Sphere is an adult science fiction movie, which means a lot of jabber in
scientific wordspeak that's supposed to impress as well as substitute for
laser blasts or bug-eyed monsters.
 Sphere is absorbing and suspenseful, but at almost two hours and 20
minutes, the guessing game becomes tedious, especially when it seems the
protagonists are repeatedly covering the same plot points.
 Ironically, the film's strong point is also its flaw. Director Barry
Levinson builds up audience expectations to such a fever level that the
payoff is a complete letdown, leaving you to ask, "Is that all there is?"
 The screenplay by Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio (Donnie Brasco, Quiz
Show), was adapted from a novel by Michael Crichton. The story revolves
around a spaceship discovered at the bottom of the Pacific Ocean. It seems
the ship has been resting in the deep for about 300 years.
 A team of scientists, played by Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L.
Jackson and Liev Schreiber, are drafted by the government to investigate.
 Unfortunately, every answer they find leads to another riddle. Thus, the
questions pile up rapidly - too rapidly at times - while the few
explanations devised by the scientists seem feeble and far-fetched.
 The characters themselves act illogically and obtuse, especially for
scientists.
 They don't seem to ask the right questions - or even know them. It's as if
their synapses are frequently short-circuited.
 Ultimately, you are left to draw your own conclusions, which is a weak
device on the part of the filmmakers and frustrating for the audience.
 Many loose ends are left dangling while the resolution for other events
merely goes unexplained.
 The acting as well is inconsistent. There is a lack not only of chemistry,
but of communication and teamwork among the leads. It is as if each were
involved only in his or her own character without taking the time to relate
to the others.
 Hoffman, as a psychologist, seems rather dense, while Stone, as a
biochemist, goes from cold, scientific logic to near-hysteria and emotional
insecurity.
 Jackson literally sleeps his way through the film, coming alive in spurts.
He fails to get a handle on his character, and it's difficult to discern
whether he's apathetic or possessed by an alien presence.
 Sphere tries hard to be an intelligent genre piece, but a weak and
convoluted storyline only leads to a disappointing experience.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Matthew Brissette
If there is a lesson to be learned from Sphere , it's that sometimes
less is...well , less is sometimes not a good idea for a potential
blockbuster. Not that Sphere enters that esteemed category , oh no , far
from it. Add to this the fact that , weeks in advance , i was preparing
myself to be sorely disappointed by this flick. I am happy to report
that all those weeks of mental preparation and intense meditating have
paid off...these excercises have softened the blow i received upon
learning that this movie is perhaps the biggest rip-off since i bought a
Beta video all those years ago. (The horror , the horror...)
As with all Michael Crichton adaptation it is safer to stick with the
novel , which just happens to be one of his best. Please god , tell me
why Hollywood feels the need to rip open and tear out the heart of every
good novel it plans on filming , i need to know. Why! WHY! Of course , i
know that some scenes from certain novels are impossible to film , that
some scenes need to be left on the cutting room floor because the movie
might run too long. Ok , fine. But i get the feeling the editor went a
little overboard with the scissors this time. 
(Warning , minor spoilers ahead. But nothing you haven't already deduced
from the trailers.)
A perfect example of the destruction left in the wake of the psycho
editor (or the accountant who kept decreasing the budget) is what is
supposed to be a thrilling giant squid attack. Well , at least it was
thrilling in the book , there the monster from the deep kept ramming and
squeezing the undersea habitat. Kool. Now , Hollywood knows giant
squids. Hollywood as done giant squids. So how come we do not get to see
the fucking squid!!! All the elements are there , the hull is buckling ,
glass is cracking , the power is dropping and things are bursting into
flames and exploding...normal behavior during a giant squid attack.
A few years ago NBC did a mini series called The Beast which had a giant
squid. If NBC can do a (semi) convincing squid why can't a major studio
like Warner Brothers even show us one??? Oh sure , we see it's outline
on the radars when it is coming but that is it. No tentacles , no great
big menacing eyes...nothing. Not one sucker.
Except for any poor fool who paid to see this movie.
Later on , somebody asks if "you liked the giant squid"? 
I'll leave my reaction to your fertile imaginations.
In fact , the entire set of special effects (or lack of ) leaves
something to be desired. The Sphere itself is , for lack of a better
term , liquid metal. Yawn...been there , done that. The submarines and
the spacecraft are no better than your average Seaquest episode and
except for one gorgeous explosion near the end , the effects are
forgettable.
Ditto the cast , which is a shame since these are all actors i like.
Dustin Hoffman makes grand gestures when he talks and squirms like a
dying cockroach when a sea serpent climbs up his leg. Mind you , i'd be
doing the same thing...but better. Sam de Man breezes through his role ,
i know he can be great so i'll forgive him for this
performance...eventually. Sharon Stone is a bit better than usual ,take
it as you wish. 
My reaction to their performances is due to their lack of reactions.
Person just died , pass the bagels. Giant squid attack (hehehe) causing
two more deaths , heck , let's play cards. Yes i know that's not what
they 
do , but they might as well have.
The camerawork is so erratic i could not tell what was going on half the
time. This is supposed to be exciting. I have to suppose that a headache
is the price to be for being excited that much. And finally , the
pacing. The movie keeps jumping from one scene to the next without any
sort of "while he was busy trying to enter the Sphere we were cooking
muffins". No sir , instead we get "say , i really wanna get in the
Sphere BING! i'm there".
Rating: 1 and a half stars for Dustin Hoffman in a wet t-shirt (if you
like that sort of thing you can add a star) and a less than convincing
giant squid (ladies and gentlemen , the amazing invisible giant squid ).
Warning: Exciting scenes in this movie might cause coma.

Author
Martijn van Turnhout
"Sphere" heeft voor elk wat wils. Voor de filmfanaten is er Dustin
Hoffman, de mannen (inclusief ondergetekende) kunnen zich vermaken met
Sharon Stone en de verlichamelijking van 'cool', Samuel L. Jackson, is
ook aanwezig. Ondanks deze 'starpower' heeft de film het niet zo goed
gedaan in de Amerikaanse bioscopen en dat is wel jammer, want, afgezien
van een paar vage wendingen, is deze film niet slecht. 
"Sphere" gaat over een buitenaards ruimteschip, dat 300 jaar geleden in
de zee gestort is. Er wordt een team van wetenschappers naar toe
gestuurd, bestaande uit Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman), Beth Halperin
(Sharon Stone), Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson) en Ted Fielding (Liev
Schreiber). Na een korte uitleg wordt hun duidelijk gemaakt dat, na al
die honderden jaren, het ruimteschip nog steeds een zoem uitzendt. Het
zou dus goed kunnen dat de buitenaardse wezens nog leven. 
Dit team wordt dus naar beneden gestuurd, de zee in. Eenmaal aan boord
van het ruimteschip, ontdekken ze dat het niet helemaal buitenaards is.
En als dat niet genoeg is, vinden ze ook nog een grote, goudkleurige bol
(de sphere dus) van een uitzonderlijke perfectie. Eén van de
wetenschappers besluit in de bol te stappen en dan beginnen de problemen
pas goed. 
"Sphere" heeft veel baat bij de vele sterren die in de film rondlopen.
Naast Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone en Samuel L. Jackson zien we ook nog
Queen Latifah en Peter Coyote in een paar kleine rollen. En dat is maar
goed ook, want "Sphere" moet het niet hebben van het verhaal. Alhoewel
het begin wel erg goed is, wordt de film, naarmate het einde nadert,
steeds meer ongeloofwaardiger. 
Gelukkig houdt regisseur Barry Levinson er de vaart in. De film is op
geen enkel moment saai, wat vooral door Levinson en de mysterieuze
wendingen komt. De drie belangrijkste hoofdrolspelers weten gelukkig nog
wat van hun platte personages te maken. Ook de special effects zijn de
moeite waard, vooral die in het ruimteschip. Trouwens, een film waar
Sharon Stone in zit, is altijd de moeite waard. 
And you can find my film reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Martijn+van+Turnhout

Author
Ben Hoffman
It has happened before and will happen again.  Nevertheless, it
seems always to come as a surprise when a film that boasts such
fine actors as Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, and Samuel L Jackson,
can be so ordinary.
Although Michael Crighton's book was a best seller, it must have lost
a lot when it was brought to the big screen.   This Science Fiction
story is of a something wicked that resides  deep in the ocean.  It
can read your mind; it can capitalize on your worst fears so that you
behave differently than you ordinarily would let anyone see.
Dr Norman Goodman (Hoffman), a psychologist, gets a mysterious
summons from the government and taken to somewhere in the Pacific
Ocean.   There he is met by an old girlfriend, Beth Halperin,
(Stone) a biochemist and Harry Adams (Jackson), a mathematician .
In charge of the mission is Barnes (Peter Coyote). Their mission, as
they used to say on Mission Impossible, is to investigate a huge
spaceship that appears to have been lying on the ocean's floor for
some 300 years.
Equipped with massive bathyspheres capable of descending into the
ocean's depths, the members of the team begin their explorations..
As is de rigueur in filmmaking these days, the special effects play
a large part in the film.   Unfortunately, they are rather on the
dull side.  For that matter, so are the non-special effects.
Inside the spaceship is a large sphere whose meaning no one seems to
fathom.  But once under the surface, their latent fears
(claustrophobia and subconscious terrors) make their appearance,
With the oxygen supply running low, there is an urgency to find out
what the sphere is all about but in their confusion and haste the
scientists begin to do battle, to rebel against their
fellow-explorers.    Despite Barry Levinson, the film seems to go
nowhere.

Author
David Wilcock
(WARNER BROTHERS)
RUNNING TIME: 134 MINUTES (2 HOURS 14 MINUTES)
STARRING DUSTIN HOFFMAN, SHARON STONE, SAMUEL L. JACKSON
DIRECTED BY BARRY LEVINSON
With his successful books and movies, Michael Crichton is doing well.
With early successes with Westworld (1973) and Coma (1978), and recent films
such as Jurassic Park (1993), his films have been entertaining. However, he
seems to taken a wrong turn somewhere with Sphere. This $100 million mess by
good director Barry Levison (Disclosure) is dull, long winded, and a huge
disappointment. Considering the huge budget, the all star cast, and a story
by Crichton, Sphere is majorly disappointing.
The film opens with Norman Goodman (Hoffman), a psychologist who thinks
he is visiting an airplane crash to console the survivors. However, when he
arrives, he his told by supervisor Barnes (Peter Coyote) that he is actually
investigating an spacecraft. Along with Goodman is mathematician Harry Adams
(Jackson), biologist Beth Halperin (Stone) and Ted Fielding (Liev
Schrieber.) They investigate the spaceship, find a massive sphere inside,
meet an alien intelligence called Jerry, and basically weird crap happens.
Unfortunately, something went wrong along the way with Sphere. The film
starts off entertaining enough, but throughout this very long movie, it just
gets sillier and sillier. The film jaunts along from scene to scene, never
fully explaining what is going on. The actors and directing don't help,
either. Hoffman is on autopilot (and almost seems embarrassed) throughout
the movie, churning out dull lines, and probably wondering what the hell he
is doing in this movie. Stone is useless, displaying no emotion, and fails
to convince the audience that she has any feelings for Hoffman. The only
person who seems to be having fun in this movie is Jackson, who's funny as
the mathematician who slowly goes crazy and entering the sphere. But he's
hardly in it, and by the end of the film he is just as dull as Hoffman and
Stone. The same goes for Peter Coyote, who hams it up as the officer, but is
then killed off halfway through. The director, Barry Levinson, who directed
the better Crichton adaptation Disclosure (1994) messes up with the drama
and the action. The drama scenes are, quite frankly, boring, and the action
scenes suffer from overkill, with Levison throwing the camera all over the
place (much like the godawful Speed 2, 1997)
The writing doesn't help much, either. Although Crichton is great with
plots, he's terrible with dialogue, and practically every line in Sphere is
a dud. The speech is too simple, I was hoping it would be a bit more
intelligent.  Practically every line is just stating the obvious. None of it
is smart. Also, where the hell did the budget go? The sphere itself is
impressive, and there's a few nice special effect shots, but where the $100
million went is anyone's guess. There's a giant squid attack in the picture,
but not once does the audience see the squid, even though the film has a
massive budget. I assume the picture was trying to build up tension by not
showing the squid, and if handled correctly it probably would. But the whole
scene is done badly, and I was just hoping we could see the stupid squid.
Finally, the film has no idea what genre to be. Levison can't handle his
own plot. It leaps from hokey sci-fi, to horror, and finally The
Shining/Event Horizon psychological thriller. And, of course, the film is
very much like The Abyss (1988), although in it's defense, Crichton did
write Sphere before The Abyss was released (and is far superior to this
rubbish.) It's not all that bad though. The plot is all right, there's a few
jump scenes (although nothing very scary) and there's the occasionally
interesting bit. But overall, Sphere is a big waste of some fine talent, a
lot of money, and a potentially good movie. Not really worth seeing.
OVERALL RATING=  ** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK

Author
Matt Williams
For many years, Michael Crichton's novel Sphere has sat around simply
awaiting a film adaptation.  However, unlike his more recent novels
(which are almost published in screenplay format), Sphere makes an
attempt at some genuine science fiction ideas...concepts which don't
lend themselves toward easy screen translation.  But, finally, director
Barry Levinson has tackled the screen project.  The result, though, is
mixed.
Several years ago, psychologist Norman Hoffman (Dustin Hoffman) drafted
a report for the government detailing procedures for a possible first
contact with an alien life form.  Thinking it was a bureaucratic
boondoggle, he whipped out a half-serious report that named several of
his colleagues as members of the first contact team.
Now he has been called out to the South Pacific, where that very team
has been assembled.  There's mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel L.
Jackson), astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), and biochemist
Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone), with whom Norman had a brief romantic
fling several years before.
The team is there to investigate an alien spacecraft which apparently
crashed into the bottom of the ocean 288 years before.  Barnes (Peter
Coyote), a military officer, is overseeing the operation, which involves
transferring the team to a mobile habitat on the ocean floor.  But they
aren't quite prepared for what is uncovered in the
spacecraft...something mysterious and profound...but possibly deadly.
James Cameron tackled similar subjects, but with much greater success,
in his 1989 underwater epic, The Abyss.  Here, despite the talented
cast, many of the shocks lack impact, and the wonders just don't quite
seem so wondrous.
Too often, it is left up to the dialogue to explain the mood and
atmosphere. This is fine when the characters themselves are creating
that mood, but when it is generated by their situation, the audience
should be able to feel the dread without having it explained for us.
The cast is what saves this movie from being a disaster, though none of
them are at the top of their form here.  Hoffman manages to be the
central link for the audience, even though his performance is rather
flat. Samuel L. Jackson has a good turn as the mathematician who may
think too much for his own good.  Sharon Stone has the meatiest role,
but never sells the audience that she is on the borderline of a
breakdown.
A few of the sequences actually do work, and there are times when the
film almost manages to create a mood.  But these intermittent flaws
eventually pass.
The film's final revelation was a little hokey in the book, and is even
more so when writ large upon the screen.  The film strives to be
profound, but ends up being forgettable.
There are gleams here and there of several intriguing ideas, but they're
never fully realized.  If you relax and go with the flow, Sphere ends up
being a mildly enjoyable, but, overall, an unsatisfactory experience. If
you're looking for truly thoughtful science fiction, go out and rent
Contact, and skip Sphere.  However, if you're just looking for a
diversion, Sphere may fit your bill.
- Matt Williams (matt@shreck.com)
Reviewer for Shreck's Cinema: http://www.shreck.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Michael Redman
Underwater science fiction stays submerged
One of the most unpleasant experiences that can occur in a movie theater is
when a cast of fine actors end up in a film that wastes their talents. You
keep thinking what they might have accomplished with the time they squandered.
Psychologist Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman) is called to the middle of the
Pacific Ocean to work with the survivors of a plane crash. When he arrives at
the site, he discovers that there is no plane, but rather an enormous
spacecraft that has been sitting 1,000 feet below the surface for almost 300 years.
Having written a paper for the Bush administration on how to handle first
contact, he is chosen to head up the team of scientists investigating the 
ship. His group as outlined in his report, consists of Beth Halperin (Sharon
Stone), a biochemist; Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), a mathematician; and
Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), an astrophysicist.
Unfortunately it turns out that the writing was a blow-off project for Goodman
who did it for the money and named his then-colleagues to the team. "After
all," he explains, "who reads government documents?"
Lead by Harold Barnes (Peter Coyote), a top secret federal operative, the
group descends to a mobile undersea headquarters set up next to the alien
vessel. Once there they stroll over, knock on the door and explore the
still-operational UFO. Discovering the surprising origin of the ship and the
crew finds an astonishing gigantic golden liquid metal sphere. When Adams
enters the sphere, the weirdness unfolds.
A storm rolls in on the surface and the team is forced to remain below just as
an unseen presence begins to communicate through their computer. "My name is
Jerry. I am happy" flashes across the screen. This is unsettling for the
psychologist. "What happens if Jerry gets mad?" he asks. Barnes is more
pragmatic: he needs a last name because he can't put in his report that they
made contact with an alien named Jerry.
Then the situation turns bad. Deadly beasts appear from nowhere. A gang of
jellyfish kills one of the Navy personnel. Lethal sea snakes attack Goodman. A
giant squid batters the habitat just as Adams is reading "20,000 Leagues Under
The Sea". The suspicious scientists turn against each other.
This has all the makings of a first-rate thinking man's science fiction film.
However even the finest ingredients don't go very far in the hands of a chief
who doesn't seem to care about his product. Director Barry Levinson has
churned out a mish-mosh that doesn't engage the audience beyond a few skillful
suspense scenes.
The first of the film zooms by as the situation and players are introduced
without any characterization or justification. It's much like speed-reading a
novel and realizing that you missed the nuances. It doesn't get any better
when the action scenes begin.
While the actors do an adequate job with their limited roles, the people are
still flat. Oddly they hardly have reactions when deaths occur around them.
After Adams experiences the interior of the sphere, no one bothers to ask him
what happened. Their history together is an intriguing plot device but is
barely exploited. Even Goodman and Halperin's ill-conceived affair when she
was his student is just mentioned in passing. Her psychotic tendencies are
talked about but never convincing.
There's a truism that items shown early in a movie must be used before the
ending, but here they are far too obvious. When an emergency mini-sub is
explained, you know what's going to happen.
The movie affectations are nothing more than distracting. Chapter headings
that divide the movie have no function. The shaky camera work muddies already
perplexing chaos. Much of what goes on is confusing and difficult to follow.
Although some of the disorientation eventually is understandable, a great deal
of it isn't.
Even a science fiction film must be internally consistent. There's too much
here that doesn't make sense. Are the manifestations real? The jellyfish kill
Queen Latifa (in a throw-away role) and the squid nearly destroys the outpost,
but the bites of the fatal snakes have no effect. A scene in the sub suggests
that it's illusion, but earlier episodes indicate that it's not.
Not everything has to be explained to death, but there are major questions
that the film never answers. Where the ship came from is clarified, but how it
ended up on the ocean floor in 1709 is merely alluded to. Even the enigmatic
sphere is still mysterious when the credits roll.
The climax is followed by 15 minutes of epilogue that does little but weaken
the already labored tale. After pre-release audience testing, the actors were
called back to re-shoot the ending. It's difficult to imagine how the original
could have been worse.
Following the recent tradition of lengthy films, this weighs in at over two
very long hours. The weak scenes could have been cut, but then there wouldn't
have been much left. The movie was supposedly held up by effects work, but
there's nothing special on the screen. We never even see the monstrous squid
or the menacing storm. Stealing from "Alien", "The Abyss" and the disastrous
"Event Horizon", this film has learned nothing from them.
Remarkably Levinson and Hoffman's other currently showing film is "Wag The
Dog", a smart and entertaining piece of work. This one could have been titled
the same sans one word.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and is amazed that
the Wild Raccoons Party Mardi is next week. It seems like only a year since
the last one. Redman@bvoice.com is the magical electronic eaddress.)
[This appeared in the 2/19/98 "Bloomington Voice" Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Nick Amado
Review: SPHERE
Directed by: Barry Levinson
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Liev Schrieber, Petere Coyote
Approx Running Time: 135 min.
Based on the novel by Michael Chricton
Sphere, "Busy" Barry Levinson's latest project, dances between so many
genre's it's hard to keep up. But in the end, it is only the cast that
makes this a watchable, occasionally interesting film.
Hoffman, Stone, Jackson and Schreiber play a group of scientists, and
professionals who are chosen to explore an undersea, unexplained
extra-terrestrial phenomenon. An other-worldly ship apparently lodged
itself at the bottom of the Pacific ocean nearly three hundred years
ago.The group soon discovers that they aren't the first people to
explore the it, and they begin to wonder if it may be a man made
vessel. We are a bit curious too, as a matter of fact, but that
curiosity goes away when other things cloud the picture and lead us to
other unexplained events.
Though some of the screenwriting (by current Oscar nominee Paul
Attanasio) is witty and amusing (and some hackneyed and clichčd),
Sphere can't help but drown itself (you should excuse the pun) in
psychological, flat thrills. None of the bizzare events that unfold
are logical, and they don't have the punch of those you might find in
an episode of the Twilight Zone. Sadly, Sphere misses with it's
storyline.
This film could have been saved with a satisfying finale, but alas, it
will end up in the "Bad Ending Hall of Shame". Chrichton seemed unable
to find a suitable ending, so he came up with this one on a really bad
day.
What's surprising about Sphere is that it was directed by the
marvelous Barry Levinson, who brought us Good Morning Vietnam, Wag the
Dog, Sleepers and Rain Man. Here, he is totally out of his
element. The fact that he is trapped under water in a strange ship
really confines him -- he is a director who needs physical space to
explore. With Sphere, he is resigned to deal with special effects and
good actors to keep it afloat. (I'm sorry, I can't help it.)
Sphere is enjoyable in a few respects. Jackson is not in top form, but
Hoffman and Stone are. There are some amusing scenes, and nothing is
funnier than a group of talented actors in a small room, high on
helium. It's main fault, though, lies in its ill-conceived story and
never-explained developments.I couldn't help but ask, "but why....?"
Two out of Four stars
Copyright (C) 1998 Nick Amado
*******************************
Questions, comments? More water jokes? Email me at namado@concentric.net

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Three big name actors, Hoffman, Jackson and Stone, one big name author,
Michael Crichton, and one big name director, Barry Levinson, get
together and create an underwater science-fiction movie called SPHERE.
Just imagine THE THING (8/10) meeting ALIEN (7.5/10) in THE ABYSS.
PLOT:
Underwater spacecraft in uncovered by the U.S. government, and four
relevant experts in their respective fields are sent down to
investigate the unknown entity. Once beneath the ocean, the group makes
contact with a source from within the vessel, and attempt to piece
together the mystery that is the sphere inside the unexplained
discovery. 
CRITIQUE:
Cool premise and eerie buildup from the first hour, ultimately
downshifts into an unsatisfying film that drags long past its bedtime,
and turns into a gobbledygook of psychological head games and
illusions. Add to that the loss of coherency about halfway, and a major
anticlimactic ending, and I can't really say that I thoroughly enjoyed
this two-hour plus piece of celluloid. Which is all too bad, because I
really liked the first hour, especially the whole claustrophobic feel
of the group underwater with the unknown swimming all about them. 
The actors all play their cards real well, with Schreiber pulling off a
good performance as the egghead astrophysicist, and Sam Jackson coming
through as the hairless mathematician with the uneven glimmer in his
eye. Stone was also pretty good, but nothing special could be said
about Hoffman's by the numbers "nervous dude" character, whose
umpteenth performance he seemed to be calling in from his home. And
despite Levinson creating some real suspense early on, the overall feel
of the picture was quite uneven, along with the absence of a gentleman
by the name of style.
Overall, this movie did offer some suspenseful and potentially potent
scenes early on, but by the end of this overly long picture, I just
felt like a kid who'd been staring at a nacho plate all evening, only
to have it taken away at the last minute by a grumpy old man with a
crutch. The ending is lame and confusing, the payoff from the early
decent premise never really comes through, and the clock ticks at least
thirty minutes past its due time. Having said that, the performances
are decent, and the early tension and suspense of the film is enough
for me to recommend it for at least one night of dark, moody
strangeness and confusion. 
Note to nacho-platers: Don't waste your salsa on this one. Slap some
sour cream on the side, and you should be okay.
Little Known Facts: 
In the 1970's, Barry Levinson wrote for "The Carol Burnett Show", and
won two Emmies in three years. Levinson also co-wrote the script for
Norman Jewison's Al Pacino vehicle ...AND JUSTICE FOR ALL with his
then-wife Valerie Curtin. Interesting to note that in all of his films,
Levinson has featured character actor Ralph Tabakin in a small role.
Did you know that Sharon Stone's IQ is 154, and that she is a member of
MENSA? In 1986, Sharon was in a TV commercial for Seagrams 7 Golden
Wine Cooler with fellow struggling actor at the time, Bruce Willis.
Sharon also appeared on TV's "Star Search" as a contestant in the
spokesmodel category in the mid-80's. Her payday for her breakthrough
hit BASIC INSTINCT (7.5/10) was $750,000. 
Dustin Hoffman stands 5"5, and made $17,000 for his breakthrough
performance in THE GRADUATE (6/10).
Peter Coyote's real name is Peter Cohon.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
I'm spoiled.  Long before I had ever read a single Michael Crichton novel, I
read Stanislaw Lem, the Polish science-fiction writer who has far more to
say in one book than Crichton has had to say in all of his.  The book in
question was SOLARIS, a novel about a planet that appears to be a life form
unto itself.  Crichton probably didn't plagarize SOLARIS to write SPHERE,
but it's simply an infinitely inferior book compared to Lem's novel.
SPHERE, the movie from said novel, suffers from all the same drawbacks.
Worse, there has already been a movie made of SOLARIS, by the Russian
filmmaker Andrei Tarkovsky, which is haunting and chilling in ways that this
film, directed passively by Barry Levinson as a holding action before WAG
THE DOG, cannot even begin to conceive of.
The plot: A ways back, a psychologist by the name of Norma Hoffman (played
by *Dustin* Hoffman), put together a government report on what to do if E.T.
comes calling.  He named several colleagues of his as members of a "contact
team" -- almost jokingly, it seems, but the government gets the last laugh
when the team is activated for a mission to the South Pacific.  Sure enough,
down on the ocean floor, there are the remains of a spaceship that crashed
there -- almost 300 years ago.  (There is one funny moment straight from the
book about the maker of the ship's electronics that I will not spoil here.)
What they find is by turns intriguing and idiotic.  A pattern gets set up:
we get the hint of something that may be an explanation, and then we're
forced to discard it and start from absolute scratch.  This is annoying.
When we finally DO understand what the Sam Hill is going on, it doesn't make
any sense -- and the conclusion the movie tries to draw from it is just
plain limp.  The effects are decent, but they are no more than a light show
to support a movie that really isn't about much of anything.  I kept
harkening back to THE ABYSS, which generated horrible suspense with nothing
more than a broken umbilical cable -- or the exploding rivets of DAS BOOT.
Nothing like that holds the attention here.
The actors try.  They do not get far.  Samuel Jackson is probably the best
of the bunch, since he can pretty much survive anything through a show of
attitude.  Sharon Stone, who is a better actor than people realize (see LAST
DANCE and CASINO, and the upcoming THE MIGHTY!), is totally lost.  And
Dustin Hoffman himself does a reprise of the same territory he did with
OUTBREAK.  No wonder they're content to just drift: the material they're
given doesn't afford them a chance to really make their performances matter.
So.  When do we get a Tarkovsky revival?

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the ONLINE CRITIC'S ASSOCIATION AT:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
It looks more and more like Hollywood is running out of ideas.
Remember a little space horror film entitled 'Event Horizon' from
1997?  'Sphere' has almost the exact same plot and manifestation of
visual output except that 'Event Horizon' is a lot scarier and I
actually recommended that one for the kind of film that it was because
it was the first film in a long time that made me jump in my seat at
the movies as it was genuinely scary with religiously sublime
overtones.  I can't recommend 'Sphere'.
I get so angry at Hollywood marketing through coming attractions on
posters, trailers, newspaper, t.v. and radio ads when they say
'Sphere' is from "Michael Crichton, the author of 'Jurassic Park' and
'The Lost World'" and immediately people begin saying, "Wow, if it's
from that guy, it must be great".  To no one's surprise, in many cases
advertising is an insult to the intelligence and we've all fallen for
it at one time or another.
'Sphere' is from director Barry (in most cases--'yawn') Levinson who
has concocted a flat and lifeless motion picture disguised as science
fiction but looking more like a low budget episode of any paranormal
television series with a cast of actors far beyond the realm of this
mess.
Dustin Hoffman (a psychologist), Sharon Stone (a biologist) and Samuel
L. Jackson (a mathematician) along with two others are sent on a
mission to the bottom of the Pacific Ocean to investigate an alleged
alien spacecraft that landed more than 300 years ago.  As they
investigate further, there is a strange transmission coming from
somewhere on the ship that allows the crew to communicate with an
unseen force and later they discover a gigantic golden sphere which
reflects everything in the room except the people looking at it.
Members of the team get drawn into it and they later draw conclusions
that it has the power to inhibit mind control at will and visually
enhance a person's sub-conscious thoughts.  At one point Jackson is
reading the book '20,000 Leagues Under the Sea' and says to Hoffman
that he can never get past page 87 because it's "too scary".  Later,
Hoffman finds the cupboards of the ship filled with multiple copies of
'20,000 Leagues Under the Sea' all with blank pages after page 87.
The film is just downright boring and never gets off the ground with
any substance or point of interest worthy of a plot twist and the film
feels like a nightmare you have trouble describing to people the next
morning because it was so weird, people look at you funny.  There's
also no reason for it to be well over two hours with a running time of
132 minutes.  I looked at my watch about every fifteen minutes after
the first half hour and I was drawn into a tedious and restless
odyssey of blandness.
There isn't much more to write because there isn't that much more to
say about a film that looks so similar in many of its scenes.  The
only thing memorable about 'Sphere' is telling people that for quite a
while, Dustin Hoffman appeared in a movie about every five years and
now that he's been in three in the last 6 months ('Mad City', 'Wag the
Dog', 'Sphere') perhaps it was a good idea for him to remain absent
until a good project came along, one that he could really believe in.
There certainly isn't a good film contained in this block of
celluloid.
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Steve Rhodes
     SPHERE, the latest Michael Crichton novel to be brought to the
screen, is a physical and psychological thriller that keeps you on the
edge of your seat.  Barry Levinson, the director of the excellent and
topical movie WAG THE DOG as well as his Academy Award winning RAIN
MAN, brings just the right blend of fast-paced action sequences and
slower mental exercises.  Using some of the same scientific deduction
techniques as last year's CONTACT, the movie involves your brains as
well as your emotions.
     Good film critics develop a sense of what is enough to tell their
readers about a movie to give them a feel for it without giving away
key plot twists.  (Today's studio trailers, on the other hand, feel
compelled to give away everything to audiences in a misguided fear that
they will not see the movie otherwise.)  SPHERE tests the abilities of
critics since several elements of the story that are best left
unmentioned are so central to the critique of the movie.  I will, as
always, try to strike the right balance and in the case of SPHERE
probably give away much less than other reviewers since it is the
delight of the surprise that makes this movie so interesting and
involving.
     As SPHERE opens, psychologist Norman Johnson, played perfectly
with humor and vulnerability by Dustin Hoffman, is on his way to a
plane crash in the middle of the ocean.  Or so he thinks.  It seems
that years ago, as a lark, he had written a pseudo-serious white paper
for the government on how to handle the discovery of an alien
spacecraft.  Now, they have discovered an alien craft deep down on the
ocean floor that is covered by so much coral that they know it landed
there almost 300 years ago.  Moreover, they have detected that there is
still a motor humming within the ship.
     Leading the crew that goes down to investigate is an
anal-retentive officer named Harold Barnes from one of the spy
agencies.  As the no-disasters-on-my-watch Harold, Peter Coyote gives a
stern eye to all of the scientists on board.  In a tense moment after
they establish communication with the HAL-like alien, Harold demands to
know his last name for the record.  Can't just put down that some alien
named Jerry is wreaking havoc on his crew.  Full names are mandatory in
such situations.
     Liev Schreiber plays Ted Fielding, the author of the Book of the
Month selection, "Astrophysics You Can Use."  He and fellow MIT
graduate Harry Adams trade barbs about who has the largest number of
doctorates and who got his Ph. D. first.  Harry, played with suitable
mysteriousness by Samuel L. Jackson, is the odd man out.  As all hell
breaks loose, he idles his time away sleeping, eating voraciously, and
reading Jules Verne's "20,000 Leagues Under the Sea."
     Looking like ALIEN's Ripley, a close cropped Sharon Stone plays
marine biologist Beth Halpern.  Beth has a history of mental
instability and once had an affair with Norman.  Continuing with her
recent movie tradition, Stone has no romantic scenes of any kind.  She
plays a tough cookie whose only goal is to be a survivor.
     The script interlaces just enough humor with the terror to keep
from exhausting the audience.  "Are you a religious man, Norman?" Harry
asks in a moment on the brink of total disaster.  "Atheist, but I'm
flexible," Norman replies with a nervous laughter.
     The best parts of the movie are not the scary parts, of which
several had me jumping in my seat, but the ones where they spend the
time to consider the scientific implications of what is happening.  At
one point, Harry uses a beautiful bit of scientific logic to deduce
their chances of survival.  In another, Jerry informs his new human
"friends" that he is happy.  This troubles Norman greatly.  He reasons
that an alien with emotions is a scary proposition since beings that
are happy can turn angry just as easily.
     With headings like chapters of a book the movie races to its
conclusion.  As the tension ratchets up, the film has trouble
sustaining its momentum.  By the last half hour, the picture begins to
bog down, and it ends in its hokiest scene of all.  (They got the
principals back together last month to film new scenes after the movie
had problems with its test screens.  I would love to know what the
changes were.  Please drop me a line if you know.)
     Even though they lose it somewhat in end, the film has so much
intelligence and energy than it is well worth seeing.  (There I did it.
I got through the whole review without even mentioning the sphere
itself, among many other things.  How many other reviewers will be able
to do that?)
     SPHERE runs a little too long at 2:12.  It is rated PG-13 for
sci-fi action and scary scenes and would be fine for kids around eleven
and up, depending upon how prone they are to nightmares.

Author
Jerry Bosch
The thing to fear about SPHERE is not fear itself. Or to put it
differently, if it is fear that you fear, never fear; SPHERE will not
interfere.
Ouch. Not for the puns; for the movie. I can round up the review with one
word: weak. Take a B plot, inflate it  with a big budget, surround it with
three of Hollywood's brightest stars  and what have you done? You have come
full circle, back to B. There's no getting around it, this sphere is on a
downhill roll. What we are trying to say in a roundabout way is that both
Crichton and Levinson dropped the ball. (Michael Crichton wrote the book
and Barry Levinson directed.) This is a sphere that won't get a Golden
Globe. A lead balloonmaybe.
It is difficult to say what is wrong with this movie without going deep
into the plot. And deep is where the plot takes you, into the ocean. It
also tries to take you deep into the mysteries of the mind, but alas, the
mind is an empty sphere. It seems that an American space mission from far
into the future had retrieved a spherical object from outer space, and
traveling in time missed its target and landed 300 years behind our
present, crashing to the bottom of the sea. That spoils some minor
surprises but will give you a helpful handle on the proceedings. Watching
this movie I learned the difference between puzzlement and suspense. I was
bewildered by the strange goings on, so much so that I could hardly yawn.
(I also caught a wink or so, but that is not necessarily a reflection on
the movie. I've been known to do that in some of the best.)
On the positive side, Dustin Hoffman's mature professionalism is always a
pleasure to watch and Sharon Stone delivers a meticulously crafted
performance. The scene of her emotional confrontation with Hoffman is
outstanding. Hoffman fights hard for this scene, but he loses by a nose.
Samuel L. Jackson was so bored with the whole affair that he slept through
most of the action. When he was not really asleep, he was sleep-walking.
What a waste.
SPHERE is not a terrible movie, it is OK. If it were offered as a B movie
we would forgive, enjoy  and forget. But given the budget, the cast, the
promotion and the promise, forgiving is impossible, enjoying is
questionable and forgetting is inevitable. For better entertainment than
SPHERE you may want to turn an ear to the President's affairs or Monica
Welinski's coiffure; or go out and have a beer. Double ouch. 2 ź stars out
of 5.
Jerry

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Kurt Wimmer, Stephan Hauser, Paul Attanasio (adapted from
the Michael Crichton novel) 
Starring: Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Peter Coyote,
Liev Schreiber
Synopsis: 
Psychologist Norman (Dustin Hoffman), biologist Beth (Sharon Stone),
mathematics whiz Harry (Samuel L. Jackson), astrophysicist Ted (Liev
Schreiber), and navy guy Barnes (Peter Coyote) are commissioned to stay
in an underwater research lab and explore a newly discovered giant space
shuttle that appears to have been sitting under the ocean for the last
300 years. Inside the craft the teams finds a gigantic mysterious golden
'sphere.' 
Without warning, communications with the surface get cut off, while a
mysterious entity takes over the computer and prints cryptic messages
onto the screen. Then the nightmares of the team's members
systematically get turned into physical reality. For instance, phobias
about giant killer squids, sea snakes, and jellyfish come true. (Queen
Latifah plays a navy crewman aboard the research lab, who is the first
to feel the wrath of the killer jellyfish.) Will Norman and the team
figure out who is killing whom before they all die underwater, or will
they sit around and passively wait for events to happen?
Opinion:
There are good actors and actresses in this film, as well as some
special effects, but the story itself is disappointing. The main problem
with this movie is passive characters. 
The characters aren't given any motivations or agendas. In a regular
movie, any character has a goal, the movie tosses in a dilemma, and the
character must overcome the dilemma during the course of the movie. But
in this movie, the team doesn't really 'do' anything. The characters
just lay around and passively wait for events to happen; they never even
take the offensive and counterattack. We the audience don't really care
what happens to the team because we don't know what their goals are, and
in what way the 'sphere' opposes them. At least two the main characters
visit inside the sphere and refuse to reveal any information about what
they saw. But throughout the film, and even at the end of the movie,
they never reveal why they acted that way, or what they had seen inside
the sphere, and why it was such a big secret. For the audience, all of
this adds up to an intuitive feeling of a contrived situation. 
At unexpected times the music gets overly big and intense, and various
team members tell a lie or act insane - - but again, for no explainable
reason. We don't find out - - not even in the end - - who sent the
sphere, why it was sent, what exactly it is, and what its capabilities
are. Nor do we learn anything new about the team's members, even the
ones who acted strangely.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
It may surprise some people to know that Berry Levinson, the director who
brought us Donnie Brasco and Wag the Dog, has ventured into Stephen Spielberg
territory with one of Michael Crichtons less known novels  Sphere.
After the opening credits we are hastily introduced to Dr. Norman Goodman
(Dustin Hoffman), a calm psychologist with an intellect and common sense that
more than matches the specialists around him.  Unfortunately, his credibility
isnt always dependable.  In the 1980s Norman sold the government a top-secret
report explaining what to do if alien life was ever encountered.  Also on the
report were the names of biochemist Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone), mathematician
Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson) and astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liey
Schreiber).  The problem is, the report was hastily put together because Norman
needed the cash  and borrowed material from famous writers to meet his needs.
So when a three hundred year old alien vessel is found buried deep in the ocean,
Normans report is followed like a bible.  Much to his surprise, all of people
he specified (as well as himself) are gathered together and sent to investigate
this mysterious ship.  But, as would be predicted in this sort of film, when
they are stuck hundreds of meters below the surface things start to go wrong.
A funny little character called Jerry, based inside the vessels computers, pops
up and begins to create chaos for Norman and his crew.  But all is not what it
seems, and as the film delves into the psychological aspects of its characters,
tension begins to rise and things start to hot up.
In quality and concept, Sphere is much like last years Event Horizon.  They both
created interest from the audience, but when they had it they failed to do
anything original or engaging with it  and at times its incredibly annoying to
be witness a potentially great film resort to using clichi characters and
confrontations.
Its interesting to note that the vast percentage of Spheres footage has three
of the same characters appear on the screen - and whilst this is not necessarily
a bad thing, if limited amounts of characters are going to successfully hold the
audiences attention they really need to be something special.  In this case,
they certainly are not  Norman somehow seems to be the most intelligent even
though he asks the stupidest questions, the ships commander Barnes Barnes (Peter
Coyote) is the diplomatic dork that no body likes, and Samuel L. Jacksons
character serves as an excuse to whip up some amusing dialogue.  So even though
Sphere doesnt produce the most rewarding characters, its great fun to see them
all shoved into situations that have more to do with common sense rather than
PHDs.
Yes  Sphere succeeds as a not-to-be-taken-seriously film, but this is not what
Levinson was after. Psychological thriller it should have been  but
psychological mediocrity it is.
I would love to announce Event Horizon and Sphere as great films  heck, I enjoy
so many things about them  but they both get so bogged down in a sea of Weve
this his all before material that they hardly become a worthwhile experience.
But this isnt the main thing that bothers me  being Sci Fi movies, these two
films lost sight of what they should have achieved  rather than thrilling the
audience, they merely scare the audience.
But on the up side, Sphere is a treat to watch and the special effects are
appropriately impressive. I can not, however, forgive it for watering down such
a spectacular concept into a pedestrian (and very Hollywood) flavor.
As for the three dependable actors  Hoffman, Jackson and Stone  they do look
great together, and Sharon especially is certain to arouse male interest with a
notably tight singlet/shirt. But at the end of the day, when these three people
are resorted to driving a film stuck in neutral, one must wonder why Jim Carey
or Mike Myers werent cast as the alien vessels comic reliefs.  At least then
we could laugh at them, and not the film.
As it so happens, the day after I saw Sphere I watched Basic Instinct on TV.
And lets just say, Sharon Stones vessels were moving much more appealingly in
the later film.


Author
Richard Scheib
USA. 1998. Director - Barry Levinson, Screenplay - Paul Attanasio & 
Stephen Hauser, Adaption - Kurt Wimmer, Based on the Novel by Michael 
Crichton, Producers - Crichton, Levinson & Andrew Wald, Photography - 
Adam Greenberg, Music - Elliot Goldenthal, Visual Effects - Cinesite 
(Supervisor - Carlos Aguello), Visual Effects Miniatures - Grant McCune 
Design (Supervisor - Grant McCune), End Sequence - Sony Pictures 
Imageworks (Supervisor - Walt Hyneman), Special Effects Supervisor - Ken 
Pepiot, Prosthetic/Animatronic Effects - Steve Johnson's XFX Inc 
(Supervisor - Sean Taylor), Production Design - Norman Reynolds. 
Production Company - Baltimore Pictures/Constant c Productions/Punch 
Productions.
Dustin Hoffman (Dr Norman Goodman), Sharon Stone (Dr Beth Halperin), 
Samuel L. Jackson (Harry Adams), Peter Coyote (Barnes), Liev Schreiber 
(Dr Ted Fielding)
Plot: A team of scientists are brought to the middle of the Pacific 
where they are informed they have been selected as first contact 
specialists to investigate a crashed UFO that has been discovered on the 
ocean floor. Entering the craft they discover it is really a ship from 
Earth's future that has been thrown back in time through a black hole. 
At the heart of the ship is a mysterious sphere. After one of the team 
recklessly enters the sphere, they find themselves in contact with an 
alien entity and their habitat under attack by jellyfish and giant 
squids which appear to have been manifested from out of their worst 
fears.
Nobody, with the exception of John Travolta, has quite made a career 
comeback in recent years like Michael Crichton has. In the 1970s 
Crichton had big hits with the film adaption of his novel `The Andromeda 
Strain' in 1971 and further successes as a director with the likes of 
`Westworld' (1973), `Coma' (1978) and `The Great Train Robbery' (1979). 
But after that point Crichton's star began to wane - the film adaption 
of his best-selling novel `The Terminal Man' in 1974 was barely seen, 
and his other directorial efforts - `Looker' (1981), `Runaway' (1984) 
and `Physical Evidence' (1989) - were ignored by all and sundry. 
Crichton's appeal was always founded in the post-`2001' view of the 
future as a soullessly sterile, antisceptic world where we have come to 
be crowded out by our technology or where our technology is in imminent 
danger of going out of control. But after `Star Wars' in 1977 the vision 
of a cold, sterile future was suddenly replaced by a gee-whiz enthusiasm 
for all things wondrous and Crichton's technological alarmism became 
outmoded.
In `The Encyclopedia of Science Fiction' (1992), Peter Nicholls accuses 
Crichton's novels of reading like potential film scripts. Nicholls' 
slightly cynical tone notwithstanding, there is some truth to the 
comment in that both Crichton's novels of `Sphere' (1987) and `Jurassic 
Park' (1990) were originally designed as film scripts. It is a measure 
of just how far Crichton was out of grace at the time in that none of 
these attracted any attention. Crichton also had the further ignominy of 
seeing a substantial part of `Sphere' stolen by James Cameron in `The 
Abyss' (1989).
`Jurassic Park' was however a best-seller and attracted the eyes of 
Steven Spielberg and the rest, as they say, is history. Crichton's 
middle name has suddenly become "author of `Jurassic Park'" and he has 
found himself in the midst of a major career revival even bigger than 
the success he had had in the 1970s. Although Crichton has yet to 
reoccupy the director's chair, there have been major film adaptions of 
all his books - `Rising Sun' (1993), `Disclosure' (1994), `Congo' 
(1995), `The Lost World: Jurassic Park' (1997) - and he has provided the 
original screenplays for `Twister' (1996) and created the hit tv series 
`ER' (1994- ). The `Jurassic Park' credit alone has been enough to 
propel him from has-been film-maker to one of the most cinematically 
popular contemporary novelists, rivalled possibly only by John Grisham. 
(As of this writing with `The Thirteenth Warrior', adapted from 
Crichton's `Eaters of the Dead' (1976), awaiting release later this year 
that makes only one Crichton novel - `Airframe' - that has not been 
filmed and that is being planned for next year).
Certainly `Sphere' is probably Crichton's weakest book. In it Crichton 
seemed undecided whether he was telling an alien contact story or a 
monsters from the id drama, and the ending where the protagonists simply 
wished the problem away was so absurd I threw the book across the room. 
Crichton's novels are fine for the scientific extrapolation and the 
depth of research Crichton places into them but when it came to 
characters, Crichton is utterly flat. To return to Nicholls' comment 
above, it is not hard to see why one might think that as Crichton's 
novels tend to make better films than books - film allows Crichton's 
nondescript characters to be fleshed out with actors. `Jurassic Park' is 
an enjoyable page-turner but what really made it as a film and 
phenomenon was seeing the dinosaurs in all their ferocious, 
living-breathing CGI glory.
`Sphere' comes directed by Barry Levinson, of `Diner', `Toys' and `Wag 
the Dog' fame, as well as director of Crichton's `Disclosure'. The 
script adaption is from Paul Attanasio, creator with Levinson of the 
finest series on tv at the moment, `Homicide: Life on the Streets', and 
who also adapted (and improved) Crichton's `Disclosure' for Levinson. 
And `Sphere' is really quite an impressively well-made film - the 
unfolding of the alien contact scenes and the revelation of the alien's 
identity are eerie and suspenseful. There is perhaps a little too much 
running around between ships, but the science and underwater scenes are 
conducted with an impeccable and impressive realism. There is also an 
excellent score. Levinson and photographer Adam Greenberg invest the 
story with an increasingly dark, claustrophobic tone that quite begins 
to grip the imagination. And the combined efforts of all allow a story 
that seemed fairly naff on the page to gain considerable credibility on 
screen. Levinson and Attanasio even manage to tone down and make the 
ending quite believable.
But oddly `Sphere' has been the only Crichton film so far to have been a 
relative box-office disappointment. It is puzzling as to why `Sphere' 
died a box-office death as it is really quite a good film. One suspects 
the reason for such is that it eschews big-budget special effects which 
are synonymous with sf these days in favour of cerebral, psychological 
drama. There are no show-stopping scenes of mass destruction and the 
monsters that do appear are psychological not physical. 
Crichton is an oddly divided writer. On one hand he has a fascination 
with technology - all his books come accompanied with graphs and 
diagrams - yet he is deeply sceptical of all this technology getting out 
of control. Underneath all of Crichton's work runs a single strand of 
pessimism. Crichton fears that human nature or simple human error will 
invariably cause things to go awry - be it a single strand of jammed 
computer tape nearly causing an entire viral containment facility to 
self-destruct in `The Andromeda Strain'; a epileptic becoming addicted 
to the electric shocks that are supposed to control him in `The Terminal 
Man'; or human greed causing unforeseen system foul-ups in both 
`Disclosure' and `Jurassic Park'; and machine error in `Westworld'. In 
`Jurassic Park' Crichton even manages to turn chaos theory - which is 
simply a mathematical paradigm for the impossibility of predicting 
behaviour in complex systems - into a kind of Murphy's Law where things 
will invariably go out of control. And in `Sphere' Crichton's themes are 
writ at their most visible. One film that makes interesting comparison 
here to `Sphere' is `Contact'. Both are films about alien contact and 
human prejudice. But where `Contact' says that alien contact can offer 
the possibility of a consciousness-expanding entry into a wider universe 
but that to accept it we must overcome small-mindedness; `Sphere', writ 
through with Crichton's usual doubts about human nature, is utterly 
pessimistic - holding the end view that humanity, given the miraculous 
ability to wish anything into being, will only manifest its deepest 
darkest fears and that we are better off without such a gift.
People have rushed to make comparisons between `Sphere' and other past 
sf films. There are undeniable comparisons that can be made to 
`Forbidden Planet' (1956) which involved a similar alien device which 
conjured forth repressed psychological fears, and `Solaris' (1972) with 
scientists aboard a space station being driven crazy by a sentient 
planet's manifesting forms from their unconscious in an attempt to 
communicate with them. A further point of comparative interest might 
also be last year's `Event Horizon' which inside its thorough muddle of 
ideas really wanted to be what `Sphere' emerges as. Of course the one 
film that most rushed to compare `Sphere' to was `The Abyss', being 
unaware that `Sphere' the novel predated `The Abyss'. But `Sphere' and 
`The Abyss' do make for interesting comparison. It may be heretical in 
light of the public disfavour given to `Sphere' to suggest that it 
actually works better as a story than `The Abyss' does but it is a case 
I am willing to argue. `The Abyss' had some grippingly intensive moments 
of human drama but the alien contact angle seemed awkwardly jammed onto 
the end, and the final scene (in both the original cinematic release and 
the 1992 `Special Edition') of the alien ship rising to the surface was 
a big anti-climax. `Sphere' works to a far more dramatically satisfying 
conclusion and certainly gives its alien contact theme a far more 
rigorous workout than `The Abyss' with its bunch of glowing, ethereal 
Spielberg castoffs who have come merely to wave nuclear disarmament 
flags does. Possibly this a film whose merit will undergo reevaluation 
in a few years time.


Author
Bill Chambers
(For more lame-ass reviews visit my scum-hearted website:
FILM FREAK CENTRAL!
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Set/7504
Lots to read, and a special section where you can tell me (and others)
what to see. Visit it, you damn filthy apes!)
starring Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Liev
Schrieber
screenplay by Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio, based on Michael
Crichton's novel
directed by Barry Levinson
I have a bit of a history with Sphere. In May of 1996, I began writing
a screenplay
adaptation of Crichton's novel with the naive hope that nice letters
to Mr. Levinson would
coax him into taking a look at it. After scripting 96 pages, I broke
my arm, couldn't type
for a while... I also hadn't received any word back from Barry Baby
after firing off two
notices. I wasn't aware that he had already put his assistant/script
reader to work at it. In
the end it was great practice--I was teaching myself the art of
adaptation. Still, Mr.
Baltimore could have mailed me a form letter, a polite screw you.
And now, vindication: the movie is just a damn mess.
Hoffman stars as Norman, a psychologist summoned to the bottom of the
ocean to
investigate a 300 year old spacecraft as part of the "ULF", a team he
proposed during the
Bush administration when asked to write a report on dealing with the
possibility of alien
contact. He is joined by Stone as Beth, a neurotic biochemist,
Schrieber as Ted, a neurotic
astrophysicist, and Jackson as Harry, a curiously un-neurotic
mathematician. What they
discover (along with Peter Coyote as the obligatory military hard-ass)
in their exploration
is that ship may not be alien at all but, in fact, American. And they
encounter the titular
sphere, a shiny golden ball-bearing the size of a house that reflects
people only as they are
about to get sucked into it. When this happens to one (or two, or
three) of them, all hell
breaks loose. Soon the proverbial giant squid attacks the ship.
Surprisingly, the first third of the film does the novel justice: the
pacing is good and the
dynamic between the characters is quickly established. Now, I try
always to judge a film
adaptation and its source material separately, mostly due to my not
being well-read and
having no basis for comparison. But in this case, I must. Levinson and
his writers make a
wrongheaded left turn in the plot away from the Crichton novel at the
end of act one, a
misjudgment that ultimately robs the climax of what could have been a
visually delightful
and enlightening revelation. In other words, the filmmakers play their
big card too early in
a throwaway moment that is only the first of several head-scratching
bits to come.
The acting is strong, Jackson in particular, and they're basically
working from nothing; one
would be hard pressed to determine what these characters' occupations
are if they entered
the cinema after the opening sequences. The art direction and
cinematography are
generally lazy; we've seen these steaming pipes and rusted catwalks
before. Did the
engineers of the spaceship refer back to '80's science fiction films
before designing their vessel?
The movie also, unfortunately, accentuates the book's flaws,
logic-holes that one looks
over in a page-turner. I don't want to discuss them here, now, lest I
give away the (goofy,
curious) ending, which stays true to the novel in many ways. One could
do worse than
spend a night at Sphere, but it proves that the not-bad Wag The Dog,
last month's
Levinson picture, was a blip on the radar. His career is headed the
way of Sphere's
spaceship.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Liev Schreiber,
Peter Coyote
Director: Barry Levinson
Screenplay: Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio based on the novel by
Michael Crichton
Don't you just hate the element of fake surprise, when actors get
together to make a movie about UFOs. This is how much of the movie goes:
"Oh My God, a UFO! (Not another one!) ... It's so big! (It's also very
phallic)... It's been here 300 years? (Only?)... I thought you said this
thing was made of titanium, well look I've just scratched it! (Watch
that nail strengthener!) ... I can't see my reflection in the SPHERE!
(Get a mirror!) ... I have to get inside it! (Why? It's a big, golden
ball!).... Look at these pretty Jelly fish (They sting!) ... I see
footprints and a bin labelled 'Trash'! (Environmentally correct) ... And
now a flight log... Written in English! WOW! I bet it was made in America
(Ya don't say!)... I like to read TWENTY THOUSAND LEAGUES UNDER THE SEA
Why am I getting these nightmares? (You read too much.) Where did the
giant squids come from? (Go figure?_ What is the problem here? (I think
you are.)
This movie begins with a group of scientists investigating a UFO buried
on the ocean floor. Like the awful EVENT HORIZON, weird and mysterious
phenomena occur on the science base resulting in the deaths of team
members trapped there by violent storms raging above them. This in ways
is reminiscent of THE ABYSS, a movie far superior in quality and make.
SPHERE unfortunately lacks the same intensity of suspense or tension
generated by the aforementioned. However, it does come perilously close
to being as ridiculous as EVENT HORIZON. Fortunately, it isn't as
distasteful or make claims to having gone to hell and back, although the
usual mumbo jumbo about Black Holes is used to give the viewer some lame
excuse for the ship's presence.
There is nothing worse than a poor ending to a movie and this movie does
not have a satisfactory conclusion. It leaves the audience annoyed at
the need to suspense disbelief, in order to accept what this movie wants
them to swallow. I almost choked when it was suggested that the solution
to the nightmare was holding hands, counting to three and forgetting
anything bad ever happened. God, if only it was so easy to forget, the
world would be a better place! There is a place for reality and a place
for fantasy, and only so much a person will believe just because you
said so. Sorry Michael, but even the dinosaurs are easier to swallow
than this big golden ball. Like the awful EVENT HORIZON this movie is
best viewed in the vacuum of a black hole. As for the cast, Dustin
Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson - all very unexciting.
Timothy Voon
e-mail: stirling@netlink.com.au
Movie Archives http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Tim+Voon
Hugues Bouclier's Movies in Melbourne
http://www.labyrinth.net.au/~bouclier/week/movies.html

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Barry Levinson
Written by:  Stephen Hauser, Paul Attanasio
Producers:  Michael Crichton, Barry Levinson
Cast:  Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Peter Coyote,
Queen Latifah, Liev Schreiber, Marga Gomez
Runtime:  135 min.
Production Company:  Warner Bros.
Rated PG-13:  Language, intense scenes, sci-fi violence
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
        As I wrote in my review for the egregiously underrated Event Horizon, I
hate being alone when it comes to opinions on films.  And here I am
again, in the position of having loved a film that most people--critics
and audiences--are likely to despise across the board.  I read reviews
of Sphere before seeing it, and I was expecting a bad film.  I read them
again afterwards, and now I simply disagree with every word.  This film
apparently struck me differently than it did everyone else--when they
said "boring," I was saying "captivating."  When they said "rushed," I
said "intense."  In fact, there's nothing I didn't like about Sphere:  
to me, this is everything that a big-budget thriller should
be--suspenseful, interesting, atmospheric, well-acted, and well-written.
        I saw Sphere with four friends.  Each one of them had read the Crichton
book, and I, obviously, had not (and still haven't, and probably never
will...).  My less-discerning friends thought the film was a good
translation of the book, and enjoyed both equally.  My opinion-heavy
friends, who loved the book, hated the movie.   In fact, one of my
friends even went so far as to describe Sphere as a bigger
disappointment than Congo.  I had to draw the line there.  
        Sphere opens with the gathering of four professionals--psychologist
Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman), mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel L.
Jackson), astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), and biologist
Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone).  They are gathered as a contact group for
a suspected alien spacecraft found 1000 feet below the surface of the
ocean.  When they go down to check out the enormous craft, they find
(you guessed it) a big golden ball!  Actually, it's more precise than
that--it's a perfect sphere.  As the characters try to figure out what
the sphere is, they apparently get on-line with an alien being called
Jerry...and all hell breaks loose.   The majority of the film is spent
in chaos.
        Well, let me get on with why I was fooled by this apparently-horrible
film.   First, I'm talking suspense.  I can't remember the last film I
saw that was this suspenseful.  Looking at my fingers now, I see that I
mindlessly chewed them to a pulp as I was watching.  Director Barry
Levinson does such an extremely good job of building suspense throughout
the film that, by the end, I felt totally exhilarated.   Some of the
scenes, such as an attack by a giant squid summoned by Jerry, are
chaotic without being incoherent, and the result is an array of
staggeringly claustrophobic action sequences taking place inside the
small underwater habitat.  
        Another common critical point with which I fundamentally disagree is
the suggestion of the character-less characters.  Now, keep in mind that
I went into Sphere expecting to dislike it.  I was looking for reasons
to dislike it, but I couldn't find a one.  This includes the
characters--the five main characters (the fifth being the military man
Barnes, played by Peter Coyote), by action film standards, are all
extremely well-written.  And it doesn't hurt that the film has a
God-granted cast to play the parts.  Hoffman is excellent in the main
role:  he is convincing as a psychologist (well, Hoffman is convincing
as anything), and in the scenes in which he begins to lose his mind, he
acts just the way I would expect a psychotic psychologist to act.  
        Sharon Stone is wonderful here--her character is fascinatingly
paranoid, and her condition is only accentuated by the effects of living
in an underwater habitat.  The relationship between Norman and Beth,
too, is well-developed (though I understand that this aspect is not in
the book) and by the end of the film, I was truly concerned for the
characters and wanted them to live.  Jackson, as the mathematician, is
also sharp in his role, and in later scenes he manages to be truly
terrifying just by smiling.  The supporting performances, particularly
from Schreiber, are good as well.
        Since I haven't read the book, I have no idea what magical words it
contains to warrant such an enormously negative response from fans of
it.  All I know is that films never follow the books closely, and that's
because there is a lot of information that can't possibly be naturally
stated in the film without bogging down the audience.  Sphere is already
long--well over two hours.  I don't know what could have been possibly
left out, because the themes and plot turns in this film are fascinating
and engrossing, and at the end of the film I had no
questions--everything was clear.  As far as I'm concerned, screenwriters
Stephan Hauser and Paul Attanasio have done a great job writing the
film.
        So, here I am again, alone in my opinion.  Perhaps it's a mistake to
form a review as a paranoid decree of possible misunderstanding.  That,
in effect, is what I am doing--if I were so sure that there is nothing
wrong with Sphere, I probably would not have mentioned the Other
Critics.  Maybe I'm so self-conscious of it because I continually like
films that are generally lambasted by everyone else.
          
        This time, however, I'm standing my ground.  I'm not changing my rating
or my review no matter how many negative views I read or hear about. 
You see, I simply can not understand why everyone hates Sphere.  I loved
every bit of it--I didn't want it to end.  For me, it did everything
right.  And I'll probably see it over and over again, and with each
viewing it is likely that my curiostiy as to what, exactly, makes this
such a bad film will inflate exponentially.  

Author
Steve Kong
I've read all but one of Michael Crichton's books (The Great Train Robbery)
and seen all but three of his book-to-film adaptations (The Great Train
Robbery, The Andromeda Strain, and Congo).  Of the Crichton books that I've
read, Sphere is my favourite.  So, as you might have guessed, I was really
looking forward to seeing how well the movie adaptation of Sphere turned out.
Sphere is an early Crichton book.  It's also one of his best books.  Though
all of his books are interesting and include interesting ideas, some of
them don't take full advantage of the ideas presented.  And of those, the
movie adaptations always come out worse than the books.  Sure, the book
Jurassic Park had a good idea and a good director behind it, but as a movie
it was completely wrong.  It was cut down to a shallow and somewhat boring
movie that drove people to the theatres because of its amazing sound and
special effects.  The Lost World was a weak book, which created an even
weaker movie.  Disclosure and Rising Sun had some good ideas and came out
OK onscreen.  Sphere makes it almost unscathed from book to screen.
Sphere is written in a way that it is hard to give a synopsis of the story
without giving away crucial plot points.  So, I'll work my way around the
plot points.  Sphere follows Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman, this
characters name is Norman Johnson in the book) a psychologist who wrote a
paper for the Bush administration about policies and procedures if ever an
alien species were to come to Earth.  In his paper, the Goodman Paper,
Norman outlines a group of individuals who would form a team that would
meet with the aliens.  That included himself, a biochemist (Sharon Stone),
a mathematician (Samuel L. Jackson), and an astrophysicist (Liev  Schieber).
What we find out is that there has been an apparent spaceship crash in the
middle of the Pacific and this team of experts is gathered together to
greet whatever is on the ship.  But, the twist is that the ship has been
underwater for almost 300 years.  We also find out that Norman wrote the
Goodman Paper not as a serious paper but to earn some extra cash.  "Whoever
reads government documents?"  Norman tries to explain.
Like all other Crichton books and movies, Sphere is both entertaining and
somewhat educational.  But, let's not put too much emphasis on the latter.
Sphere though is highly entertaining and the first half of the film is
captivating.  The latter half of the film gets a little water logged and we
kind of slush through it.  It is not as bad as it sounds though.
Barry Levinson directs Sphere and with Sphere Levinson has two movies on
the market right now both of them starring Dustin Hoffman.  The other film
is Wag the Dog, which is a smarter and stronger film than Sphere.  Levinson
has a style in his films that is hard to describe.  The style is quick with
flashy cuts during dialogue, but it's hard to nail down.  It is a
fascinating style.  Levinson is able to keep the film moving along at a
fast pace and keep the scares coming.  Most of the scares are more
psychological than the type where something jumps out at you. 
The script by Stephan Hauser and Paul Attanasio is tight and follows
closely to the book.  But, don't go for a bathroom break or to get food,
you'll miss a lot if you do.  The script is a bit tighter than it should
be, squeezing in a lot of material.  The script doesn't take itself all too
seriously at all times.  There is a high level of humor running through the
script to ease some of the tensions brought on by Levinson's direction.  
With all book-to-movie conversions there are going to be cuts from the book
to the script.  And there are many cuts from the book to the script for
Sphere.  Though many are not important, there are some interesting things
that were cut which I would have liked to see in the film.  Some of them
include the form fitting chairs, more of the interior of the spaceship, and
the huge battle with the monster.  My only big complaint is that there are
too many unanswered questions left after the movie is over (and this goes
for the book also).  I would have like to have more explanation of what
happened and how things happened.
Performances are all strong.  I originally thought that the casting was a
bit strange; come on Dustin Hoffman in another action movie?  He looked
highly uneasy in Outbreak can he really pull this one off?  Hoffman does
well in Sphere.  Sharon Stone was another that I doubted, but her
performance is strong also.  I loved her new short haircut.  Nice.  The
only one that I thought was cast perfectly was Samuel L. Jackson.  The part
of Harry Adams was custom made for Samuel L. Jackson.
The obvious comparison for Sphere, at first, is a comparison to James
Cameron's The Abyss.  But, as you find out after the first few minutes of
Sphere is that the two movies are far apart.  Cameron's The Abyss has a
stronger story with more fleshed out characters and better underwater
cinematography.  In comparison Sphere's characters are not one dimensional,
but they are also not as well written as Cameron's Bud and Lindsey.  And
the underwater cinematography in Sphere is a bit more murky and hard to
make out than The Abyss.
There are some things to keep in mind when viewing Sphere.  In the early
scenes of the movie look for Huey Lewis as the helicopter pilot.  I thought
he looked familiar but couldn't put a finger on it.  Sphere also continues
with Hollywood's obsession with minorities being killed off first.  This
time it's Queen Latifah (Set It Off) getting the ax first.
To date Sphere is the best movie adaptation of a Crichton book.  And since
it is my favourite Crichton book, I'm happy that it is such a good
conversion.  One more thing that was left out and I thought should have
been in the movie was the little twist at the end of the book.  This twist
made the book more enjoyable than the film.  If you like Crichton's
writing, especially his early stuff, then Sphere will be a good choice for
you.  Don't Miss Sphere at the theatres.  This is a fun film that will keep
you at the edge of your seat for the entire running length.

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
A few years back, they brought in my main man Quentin Tarantino to add a
little spice to the script of the submarine action flick Crimson Tide.
One of the scenes that bears QT's distinctive stamp is this:  Renegade
Navy officer Denzel Washington is trying to convince a communications
officer to fix a bit of equipment to contact the outside world.  Denzel
explains: OK, I'm Captain Kirk, and you're Scotty, and I need you to fix
this engine before the ship blows apart.  The crewman nods, fixes the
whatever-it-was, and Denzel saves the day.
I would have felt a little better about Sphere if they had acknowledged,
somewhere, that this was a Star Trek movie.  Because that's all it is.
And it's not a good even-numbered Star Trek film, either, but one of
those odd-numbered jobs.  Our captain is not Kirk, or Picard, but
tweed-blazered psychologist Dustin Hoffman.  The crew is a motley band
of scientists:  marine biologist Sharon Stone, mathematician Samuel L.
Jackson, physicist Liev Schrieber.  And their mission is to take our
$3.75 matinee price and bore us silly for two hours.
You'll notice that I don't mention character names, for the plain and
simple reason that I don't remember them.  Seriously.  Imagine that
you're watching, oh, let's say Star Trek 11:  The Search for the Voyage
to the Final Frontier, except that you've never, ever seen a Star Trek
episode or movie ever.  The characters are up on the screen, they all
know each other, they have a history, but you don't have the first clue
who they are or what they're all about or why they're wearing so much
makeup.  That's exactly the situation in Sphere:  All of the characters
know each other, some of them don't like each other, and the
characterization is so weak and so poor that we don't have a reason to
care.
And what's more depressing:  These are some damn good actors.  Dustin
Hoffman just got a Oscar nomination for Wag the Dog.  Samuel L. Jackson
deserved one for Jackie Brown (although I'm very glad that Robert
Forster got one, don't get me wrong).  But they're skating, phoning it
in, banking on the goodwill from past performances to carry them
through.  And it doesn't work.  The characters are so weak, the plot so
filmy, that it even these talented actors can't make it believable or
entertaining.  (Not to mention the disappointing performances of the
usually reliable director Barry Levinson and producer Michael Crichton.)
The plot is dumb, even by Star Trek standards.  There's a sphere on the
bottom of the ocean, and the away team has to investigate.  A couple of
minor "red shirt" crew members (Queen Latifah, for one, who deserves
better) die for the sake of moving the plot along.  The rest of the crew
are slowly killed off as a horrible secret manifests itself.  Will the
three highest-paid actors survive?
Special effects can save a bad movie like this (see The Lost World) but
that doesn't happen, either.  The major action scene involves an attack
by a scary giant squid.  But do we get to see the squid?  Nooo.  We get
to see the little eggs being laid, we get to see the undersea habitat
being shaken, but no squid.  (We do get to see Samuel L. Jackson reduced
to choking on a piece of fried calimari to establish that he's afraid of
squid, though.)
Rumor says that Levinson delayed filming on Sphere to finish Wag the
Dog.  May be true, I don't know -- but Sphere certainly plays like a
leftover or an afterthought.  Do yourself a favor, go rent The Abyss.
The Hollywood Stock Brokerage and Resource
http://www.hsbr.org/brokers/blueduck/

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
A mysterious big alien thingie is found at the bottom of the ocean. 
The inevitable team of experts are taken down to it, left alone and
get on each others nerves before dying one by one.
"Sphere" may not be the worst Michael Crichton novel ever written, but 
then I haven't read "Binary" or "Rising Sun".  They'd have to try hard 
to beat the monosyllabic, shaggy-dog story-telling of "Sphere" the 
novel.  So, while a film of "Sphere" shouldn't be good, it can't be 
worse than its source.
But it is, yessiree.  Unfortunately, it's not bad enough to be an 
enjoyable Bad Movie, just bad enough to be tedious.
The setup is this: a mile-long (aerodynamically streamlined!)  
starship is found on the ocean floor with a large golden disco-ball 
within.  Obviously this is a case for an elite alien contact team.  
Alas, they have to make do with one headed by the narcolepsy inducing 
Dustin Hoffman.  Inevitably, a storm traps them in their seafloor base 
for the (also inevitable) monster attack.
That setup is hardly promising, but things get worse.  A military 
sidekick to the team (Queen Latifah) gets smothered by a large swarm 
of jellyfish.  As Sharon Stone (wittilly cast against type as a genius 
marine biologist / medico / biochemist / drug-addict) extracts 
tendrils from the dead Latifah's nostrils, Hoffman honks insincerely: 
"It must have been terrible.  I can't imagine the pain."  Even more 
ludicrously, we are asked to believe that the prelapsarian Hoffman and 
wonderbuff Stone were lovers.  (Stone's faux-dyke cropped hair and 
bulging eyes makes her looks positively hydrocephalic.)  Samuel L 
Jackson pops up as a brilliant mathematician with attitude who gets 
knocked out before he can do his badass shtick.  Later, the whiny 
astrophysicist (who is not a big-name actor) gets capped because he 
is not a big-name actor, and his colleagues activate the station defence 
system which starts electrical fires every time it is used. Stone 
decides that the best way to get everyone's attention is to plant 
explosives everywhere.  Slap in the fact they never explain what the 
sphere actually is or what it's doing on board the starship, the lazy 
performances, ho-hum direction, plot inanities ...
There is one good moment, where a plausible explanation for 
assembling such a disparate team is revealed.  But this is one dull 
ember in a black hole of a movie.  Barry Levison has done much better 
than this.  [*/misfire] and extracting wisdom teeth on the Sid and 
Nancy scale.
--
paul-michael agapow (agapow@computer.org), La Trobe Uni, Infocalypse
"There is no adventure, there is no romance, there is only trouble and desire."

Author
Michael Dequina
Barry Levinson's adaptation of Michael Crichton's novel Sphere has more in
common with the story's focal otherworldly orb than just its title.  The
sphere is luminous and hauntingly beautiful on the surface, with its
interior kept alluringly, frustratingly unclear--much like the
superficially diverting but ultimately disappointing film itself.
A four-man team comprised of psychologist Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman),
biochemist Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone), mathematician Harry Adams (Samuel
L. Jackson), and astrophysicist Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber) is recruited
by the government to investigate the wreckage of a crashed spacecraft at
the bottom of the ocean.  Inside the spacecraft, the team discover a giant,
glowing, golden sphere of unknown origin.  But soon after this discovery,
strange, life-threatening occurrences befall the team in their undersea
station, from the appearance of giant sea creatures to online contact with
a possibly extraterrestrial lifeform.
This is a solid jumping-off point for a intelligent, suspenseful sci-fi
thriller, and while there are some very effective moments, the murky script
by Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio keeps Sphere from taking on a defined
shape.  Sphere does eventually offer answers to its mysteries, but the
information is often too unclearly stated and clumsily delivered.  Tune out
for one second, and one crucial, isolated line of dialogue that reveals one
of the film's key mysteries is lost, the information never to be repeated
again.  One more irksome miscalculation was the division of the action with
chapter title inserts, such as "The Surface," "The Deep," "The Spacecraft,"
and so on.  I suppose the purpose was to underscore certain important parts
of each section, but the chapter divisions hamper the building of any
suspense, which is hard to sustain once an obtrusive title card appears.
But Levinson is able to overcome that start-and-stop rhythm and  gradually
build tension, resulting in some memorable shock scenes.  The film's final
act, where suspicion is hovers over all of the central characters, is
particularly tense and well-acted by the three above-the-title stars.  It
is quite refreshing to see a science fiction film that relies more on wits
and psychological terror to drive its climax than visual effects (though
the effects are quite impressively handled).
Ultimately, Sphere ends up running out of gas before the film reaches the
end of its two-hour-plus running time.  After the strong climax, the film
drags on for about another 15 minutes, blunting the impact of all that went
on before with a finale that, while well done technically, is on the
cornball side.  Much like the mysterious object that lends the film its
title, Sphere offers its share of surface delights, but what exactly lies
underneath--if anything at all--is left up to question.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com  |  mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
CinemaReview Magazine: http://www.CinemaReview.com
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court:
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Liev Schreiber, 
      Peter Coyote
Director: Barry Levinson
Producers: Michael Crichton and Barry Levinson
Screenplay: Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio based on the novel by 
      Michael Crichton
Cinematography: Adam Greenberg
Music: Elliot Goldenthal
U.S. Distributor: Warner Brothers
     By trying to satisfy every kind of viewer, it's possible that 
SPHERE may end up pleasing no one.  Action lovers will be bored by what 
they will see as an interminably boring setup.  Audience members who 
crave more intellectual fare will be disgusted by the film's sudden 
collapse into mindless storytelling and by the ending, which is an 
insulting cop-out.  Somewhere out there, maybe there's a small cadre of 
film-goers who will appreciate SPHERE's dubious charms, but I'm not 
among them.
     I sincerely hope the novel is better than the movie (I no longer 
read anything by either Michael Crichton or John Grisham), because if 
the finished motion picture product is anything to go by, it's hard to 
understand why the rights were optioned.  SPHERE is the kind of first-
class mess that only a top-line director with an A-list cast can create.  
With expectations high (And how could they not be, considering that 
another Barry Levinson/Dustin Hoffman collaboration, the excellent WAG 
THE DOG, is still playing in theaters?), something this bad can't help 
but look even worse.  The last time a big-name, big-budget film 
displayed this level of ineptitude was last year's BATMAN & ROBIN, and 
everyone knows how that movie was received.
     SPHERE starts out a little like an amalgamation of CONTACT and 
James Cameron's THE ABYSS, but, somewhere along the way, it collapses 
into the cellar with another recent science fiction effort, EVENT 
HORIZON.  Science and philosophy, which are used to good effect during 
SPHERE'S first hour, give way to mindless, confusing action sequences.  
Attempts at characterization fall apart.  Intelligent writing, which is 
evident early on, is replaced by hackneyed drivel.  Special effects take 
over as the plotline devolves into incoherent silliness.  But all that 
is just in preparation for the ending, which is inexcusably awful.  This 
is the time-honored deus ex machina device used to its worst effect.  I 
left the theater feeling cheated by the way Crichton and his 
screenwriters had chosen to end the film.
     There is some promise, but it's all in the setup.  We're introduced 
to Norman Goodman (Dustin Hoffman), a psychologist who once wrote a 
$35,000 report for the government about what to do in the event that a 
crashed space ship is discovered.  When one is found in the middle of 
nowhere, 1000 feet below the surface of the Pacific Ocean, Norman is 
called in to be part of the welcoming committee.  On the team with him 
are Beth Halperin (Sharon Stone), a biochemist who was once his student 
and lover; Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), a mathematician who earned 
his first doctorate at the age of 18; Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber), an 
astrophysicist who is awed by the opportunity to explore alien 
technology; and Harold Barnes (Peter Coyote), the government operative 
in charge of the mission.  Together, the five descend into the bowels of 
the ocean, where they rendezvous with a temporary sea base on the ocean 
floor from which they will attempt to make first contact.
     For a while, SPHERE had me fooled into thinking it was going to 
take an astute approach to the man-meets-alien situation.  The overall 
scenario is not without promise and several plot twists (such as the 
revelation that the enormous craft is actually an American space ship, 
apparently from the future) offer intriguing possibilities.  Then, right 
around the one-hour mark (that's the time to sneak into the theater next 
door and check out whatever's left of TITANIC), the virtually non-stop 
action begins, and, once it starts, the script becomes superfluous.  
This might be acceptable if director Levinson generated some legitimate 
tension, but, instead, he relies on loud, overbearing music, strange 
camera angles, and quick cuts to make things "exciting."  Additionally, 
because none of the characters are well-formed (a common failing in 
anything penned by Crichton, who's more interested in technology than 
people), viewers don't develop much of a rooting interest.  It makes 
sitting through SPHERE a frustrating and pointless experience.
     What about that A-list cast?  Not surprisingly, the most energetic 
performance is given by Samuel L. Jackson, but his Harry isn't a person; 
he's a walking plot device spouting occasionally-witty dialogue.  Dustin 
Hoffman isn't lively or particularly good -- it's ironic that this, 
which may be his worst work in a decade, has arrived in theaters on the 
heels of his Best Actor nomination (for WAG THE DOG).  Sharon Stone and 
Peter Coyote are both flat.  Their characters exhibit little evidence of 
emotion; automatons would have been as effective.  Then there's Queen 
Latifa, who, despite getting fifth billing in the credits (ahead of Liev 
Schreiber, who boasts at least quadruple her screen time), has less than 
a handful of lines and almost nothing to do other than inflate the body 
count.  
     I like to think that Levinson and Hoffman, recognizing how 
uninspired this movie was likely to be, chose to make WAG THE DOG as a 
sort of penance (the low-budget picture was filmed during SPHERE's 
lengthy pre-production phase).  If that's the case, forgiveness is 
granted.  I'm less inclined to look favorably upon Crichton, although he 
has a few enjoyable titles on his resume (JURASSIC PARK and the 
Levinson-directed DISCLOSURE come to mind).  Even if his novel was 
butchered in the adaptation process, Crichton's credit as a producer 
disallows him absolution.  He was a willing participant in a creative 
travesty.  No wonder SPHERE is being released in February, in the midst 
of the early year's cinematic wasteland.  It deserves no better than to 
get sunk by the unstoppable TITANIC, which should plow SPHERE under on 
its way to a ninth-consecutive weekend atop the box office heap.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
James Brundage
Written by Stephen Hauser and Paul Attanasio
Based on the novel by Michael Crichton
Starring Dustin Hoffman, Sharon Stone, Samuel L. Jackson, Peter Coyote, Live
Schrieber, and Queen Latifah
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 Sphere is one of those movies I hate to review more than I hate to watch.
On one hand, you have the numerous good aspects of the film (top notch cast,
etc.).  On the other hand, you have a plot that can't be passed off in the
world of celluloid.
 Based on the novel by Michael Crichton, Sphere concerns a team called the
ULF team (Unknown Life Form).  These people, hand picked by Norman Johnson
(Dustin Hoffman) during the cold war, are a team designed to make contact
with alien life.  On it are a mathmatician (Samuel L. Jackson), an
astrophysicist (Live Schrieber), a biologist (Sharon Stone), and a shrink
who didn't take the whole thing seriously and picked people to be at each
other's throats (Dustin Hoffman).
 All of these people are sent one thousand feet under the surface of the
ocean, where they begin getting on each others nerves.
 What's worse, when they discover a sphere of unknown origin in a spaceship
that turns out to be an American spacecraft from the future, strange things
start happening.  Killer jellyfish giant squid.... extra copies of "20,000
Leagues under the Sea", oh my!
 To make a long story short, they start being killed off one by one until
there's pretty much no one left, at which point the story takes a turn for
the worse.  The movie becomes a mind exercise, which I didn't care about but
most people do.
 The fact about Sphere is that it is too true to the book.  It has reached
that point when the book has outlasted its usefulness in the adaptation, if
only because the book was a favorite among geeks like me who could grasp the
ideas set forth in it and not the average moron.
 The really disappointing thing about the straight adaptation of the book is
that the characters in the book (and, by extension, the movie), are as flat
and contrived as science fiction characters usually are.  They are
completely predictable, rarely fun to watch, and never engaging.  The
performances are fine considering, but the script inhibits four great actors
into roles they can do nothing with.
 A lesson can be learned by Sphere: don't make sci-fi mass market.  Any
movie that, half an hour in, is using deductive logic as a way to make
suspense will not make most people in college or high school frightened.
Nor will all of those shots at everyone reacting ultra-slowly to any given
situation make them seem like evil characters.  In short, Norman Johnson
never can become Norman Bates.
 Abyss fans will be pleased by the two film's similarities, but please don't
even bother calling it a rip off.  "Sphere" was written long before Abyss
came out, and thus, if anything, Abyss was a rip of the book "Sphere", not
visa-versa.
 However, Sphere the movie is a stylistic rip off of Abyss, using eerie
orchestrals and slow camera pans in order to tell the audience to be scared.
It takes every trick in the book of undersea filmmaking to try to make
Sphere interesting to the mainstream.
The fact remains that this is the modern world and sci-fi happens to be out.
Sure, The Matrix was a home run hit, but Sphere isn't that kind of sci-fi.
It's sci-fi the way sci-fi used to be done niche market.

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
It sounded too good on paper.  One of my favorite directors, Barry
Levinson (Wag the Dog), re-teaming with one of my favorite writers, Paul
Attanasio (Quiz Show), to adapt a book by one of my favorite authors,
Michael Crichton (AirFrame).  They pulled it off with Disclosure and its
A-list stars, so why couldn'tno, why SHOULDN'T they be able to do it
again?
Well, I imagine the main reason is that the story is no good.  I never
read Sphere, but have it on good authority that it kinda sucked rocks.
Levinson and Attanasio probably polished this turd as well as they
could, and the end product is a dull rip-off of the superior films in
its genre.
One should have become suspicious when Levinson ordered the actors back
to shoot additional footage less than three weeks before the scheduled
release date.  I guess the reactions from the test screenings made the
executives at Warner Bros. a little antsy.  Who could blame them?  WB's
latest crop of box office bombs include The Postman, Mad City, The Man
Who Knew Too Little, Steel, Free Willy 3 and Fire Down Below.  By Jobe,
there should be people jumping out of windows!
Sphere opens with four `experts', a bio-chemist (Sharon Stone), a
mathematician (Samuel L. Jackson), an astrophysicist (fat head Liev
Schreiber) and a shrink (Hoffman) joining a military leader (Peter
Coyote) to explore what is believed to be an ancient alien craft buried
beneath the floor of the Pacific Ocean.  Throw in rap star Queen Latifah
and performance artist Marga Gomez, and you've got yourself an eerie
preview of the next season of MTV's The Real World.  Seven strangers
picked to live in a submarine
After it kills off all of the people that don't receive billing above
its title, Sphere proceeds to `borrow' ideas from Alien, 2001, The
Thing, The Abyss and probably a bunch of other groundbreaking films that
I was too bored to notice.  Want to see a much better sci-fi film about
strangers unwillingly thrown together in a confined space?  Wait for
Cube, which will hopefully be released later this year.  Its budget was
about 2% of Sphere.  Literally.
The thing that is supposed to separate Sphere from silly films like Deep
Rising and Anaconda is that there really isn't a giant snake or angry
octopus to do battle with.  The real enemy is the imagination of the
characters.  Personally, I would have used my imagination to create a
world where I was the slave master and my harem included the entire
lineup of those Cover Girl commercials.  Instead, the characters
predictably and boringly turn against each other in individual fits of
distrust.
Levinson displays similar editing techniques to Homicide: Life on the
Streets by quickly replaying the actors dialogue from several different
camera angles.  He also lays the film out in titled chapters, which will
make it easy to `pause' and `pee' when you're watching the video, or to
get up and sneak out of the theater.

Author
Edwin Jahiel
SPHERE 1/2 *  (half a star). Directed by Barry Levinson.Written by Stephen
Hauser and Paul Attanasio, from a novel by Michael Crichton, adapted by
Kurt Wimmer. Photography, Adam Greenberg. Editing,Stu Linder.Production
design, Norman Reynolds. Music,Elliot Goldenthal.Produced by Levinson,
Crichton and Andrew Wald.Cast: Dustin Hoffman,Sharon Stone,Samuel
Jackson,Peter Coyote, Liev Schreiber.A Warner's release. 120 minutes. PG-13
